North Carolina, session 2025, HB847.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-4.01 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-4.01. Definitions.
Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply throughout this
Chapter to the defined words and phrases and their cognates:
…
(27) Passenger Vehicles. –
…
g2. Modified utility vehicle. – A motor vehicle that (i) is meets the
configurations enumerated in sub-sub-subdivisions 1. and 2. of this
sub-subdivision. "Modified utility vehicle" does not include an
all-terrain vehicle, golf cart, or utility vehicle, as defined in this
section, or a riding lawn mower.
1. A motor vehicle that is manufactured or upfitted by a licensed
manufacturer, dealer, or person or business otherwise engaged
in vehicle manufacturing or modification for off-road use with
equipment required by G.S. 20-121.1(2a), except a vehicle
identification number, and (ii) (i) has four wheels, an overall
length of 110 inches or greater, an overall width of 58 inches
or greater, an overall height of 60 inches or greater, a (ii) has a
maximum speed capability of 40 miles per hour or greater, and
(iii) does not require an operator or passenger to straddle a seat.
"Modified utility vehicle" does not include an all-terrain
vehicle, golf cart, or utility vehicle, as defined in this section,
or a riding lawn mower.
2. A motor vehicle that is manufactured or upfitted by a licensed
manufacturer, dealer, or person or business otherwise engaged
in vehicle manufacturing or modification for off-road use with
equipment required by G.S. 20-121.1(2b), except a vehicle
identification number, and (i) has an engine displacement of
124cc or more, (ii) has a maximum speed capability of 40 miles
per hour or greater, (iii) has a saddle for the use of the rider and
*H847-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
passengers, and (iv) is designed to travel on two wheels in
contact with the ground.
h. Motorcycles. – Vehicles having a saddle for the use of the rider and
designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the
ground, including autocycles, motor scooters, and motor-driven
bicycles, but excluding excludes tractors and utility vehicles equipped
with an additional form of device designed to transport property,
three-wheeled vehicles while being used by law-enforcement
agencies, electric assisted bicycles, and mopeds as defined in
sub-subdivision d1. of this subdivision.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-121.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-121.1. Operation of a low-speed vehicle, mini-truck, or modified utility vehicle on
certain roadways.
The operation of a low-speed vehicle, mini-truck, or modified utility vehicle is authorized
with the following restrictions:
(1) A low-speed vehicle may be operated only on streets and highways where the
posted speed limit is 35 miles per hour or less. A mini-truck or modified utility
vehicle may be operated only on streets and highways where the posted speed
limit is 55 miles per hour or less. This subdivision does not prohibit a
low-speed vehicle, mini-truck, or modified utility vehicle from crossing a road
or street at an intersection where the road or street being crossed has a posted
speed limit of more than 35 miles per hour.
(2) A low-speed vehicle or mini-truck shall be equipped with headlamps, stop
lamps, turn signal lamps, tail lamps, reflex reflectors, parking brakes, rearview
mirrors, windshields, windshield wipers, speedometer, seat belts, and a
vehicle identification number. Any such required equipment shall be
maintained in proper working order.
(2a) A modified utility vehicle meeting the configuration specified in
G.S. 20-4.01(27)g2.1. shall be equipped with headlamps, stop lamps, turn
signal lamps, tail lamps, reflex reflectors, parking brakes, rearview mirrors, a
speedometer, seat belts, and a vehicle identification number. Any such
required equipment shall be maintained in proper working order. If a modified
utility the vehicle does not have a vehicle identification number, upon
application by the owner, the Division shall assign a vehicle identification
number to the modified utility vehicle prior to registration. The operator of
and all passengers on a modified utility vehicle that is not equipped with a
windshield and windshield wipers shall wear a safety helmet, with a retention
strap properly secured, that complies with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standard (FMVSS) 218.
(2b) A modified utility vehicle meeting the configuration specified in
G.S. 20-4.01(27)g2.2. shall be equipped with equipment required by this
Chapter for the highway use of motorcycles and a vehicle identification
number. Any such required equipment shall be maintained in proper working
order. If the vehicle does not have a vehicle identification number, upon
application by the owner, the Division shall assign a vehicle identification
number to the vehicle prior to registration. The operator of the vehicle must
be licensed to operate a motorcycle as required by G.S. 20-7. The special
provisions for motorcycles under G.S. 20-140.4 apply to the operator and
passengers of the vehicle.
Page 2 House Bill 847-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) A low-speed vehicle, mini-truck, or modified utility vehicle shall be registered
and insured in accordance with G.S. 20-50 and G.S. 20-309.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other subdivision of this section, the
Department of Transportation may prohibit the operation of low-speed
vehicles, mini-trucks, or modified utility vehicles on any road or highway if it
determines that the prohibition is necessary in the interest of safety.
(5) Low-speed vehicles must comply with the safety standards in 49 C.F.R. §
571.500.
(6) Regardless of age, a mini-truck shall not qualify as an antique vehicle or
historic vehicle as described in G.S. 20-79.4(b)."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
House Bill 847-Second Edition Page 3